North Carolina statutes. Chapter 108C. Medicaid and Health Choice Provider Requirements.
§ 108C-7. Prepayment claims review.

In order to ensure that claims presented by a provider for payment by the Department meet the requirements of federal and State laws and regulations and medical necessity criteria, a provider may be required to undergo prepayment claims review by the Department. Grounds for being placed on prepayment claims review shall include, but shall not be limited to, receipt by the Department of credible allegations of fraud, identification of aberrant billing practices as a result of investigations, data analysis performed by the Department, the failure of the provider to timely respond to a request for documentation made by the Department or one of its authorized representatives, or other grounds as defined by the Department in rule.

Providers shall not be entitled to payment prior to claims review by the Department. The Department shall notify the provider in writing of the decision and the process for submitting claims for prepayment claims review. The written notice shall be deposited, first-class postage prepaid, in the United States mail and addressed to the most recent address given by the provider to the Department. The prepayment claims review shall be instituted no less than 20 calendar days from the date of the mailing of written notification. The notice shall contain all of the following:

An explanation of the Department's decision to place the provider on prepayment claims review.

A description of the review process and claims processing times.

A description of the claims subject to prepayment claims review.

A specific list of all supporting documentation that the provider will need to submit to the prepayment review vendor for all claims that are subject to the prepayment claims review.

The process for submitting claims and supporting documentation.

The standard of evaluation used by the Department to determine when a provider's claims will no longer be subject to prepayment claims review.

For any claims in which the Department has given prior authorization, prepayment review shall not include review of the medical necessity for the approved services.

The Department shall process all clean claims submitted for prepayment review within 20 calendar days of receipt of the supporting documentation for each claim by the prepayment review vendor. To be considered by the Department, the documentation submitted must be complete, legible, and clearly identify the provider to which the documentation applies. If the provider failed to provide any of the specifically requested supporting documentation necessary to process a claim pursuant to this section, the Department shall send to the provider written notification of the lacking or deficient documentation within 15 calendar days of the due date of requested supporting documentation. The Department shall have an additional 20 days to process a claim upon receipt of the documentation.

The provider shall remain subject to the prepayment claims review process until the provider achieves three consecutive months with a minimum seventy percent (70%) clean claims rate, provided that the number of claims submitted per month is no less than fifty percent (50%) of the provider's average monthly submission of Medicaid claims for the three-month period prior to the provider's placement on prepayment review. If a provider does not submit any claims following placement on prepayment review in any given month, then the claims accuracy rating shall be zero percent (0%) for each month in which no claims were submitted. If the provider does not meet the seventy percent (70%) clean claims rate minimum requirement for three consecutive months within six months of being placed on prepayment claims review, the Department may implement sanctions, including termination of the applicable Medicaid Administrative Participation Agreement, or continuation of prepayment review. The Department shall give adequate advance notice of any modification, suspension, or termination of the Medicaid Administrative Participation Agreement.

Prepayment claims review shall not continue longer than 24 consecutive months unless the Department has initiated the termination or other sanction of the provider and the provider has appealed that termination or sanction. If the Department has initiated the termination or other sanction of the provider and the provider has appealed that termination or sanction, then the provider shall remain on prepayment review until the final disposition of the Department's termination or other sanction of the provider.

(e1)
Failure of a provider to meet the seventy percent (70%) clean claims rate minimum requirement may result in a termination action. A termination action taken shall reflect the failure of the provider to meet the seventy percent (70%) clean claims rate minimum requirement and shall result in exclusion of the provider from future participation in the Medicaid program. If a provider fails to meet the seventy percent (70%) clean claims rate minimum requirement and subsequently requests a voluntary termination, the termination shall reflect the provider's failure to successfully complete prepayment claims review and shall result in exclusion of the provider from future participation in the Medicaid program.

(e2)
A provider shall not withhold claims to avoid the claims review process. Any claims for services provided during the period of prepayment review may still be subject to review prior to payment regardless of the date the claims are submitted and regardless of whether the provider has been taken off of prepayment review for any reason, including attaining a minimum of seventy percent (70%) clean claims rate for three consecutive months, the expiration of the 24-month time limit, or the termination of the provider.

The decision to place or maintain a provider on prepayment claims review does not constitute a contested case under Chapter 150B of the General Statutes. A provider may not appeal or otherwise contest a decision of the Department to place or maintain a provider on prepayment review.

If a provider elects to appeal the Department's decision to impose sanctions on the provider as a result of the prepayment review process to the Office of Administrative Hearings, then the provider shall have 45 days from the date that the appeal is filed to submit any documentation or records that address or challenge the findings of the prepayment review. The Department shall not review, and the administrative law judge shall not admit into evidence, any documentation or records submitted by the provider after the 45-day deadline. In order for a provider to meet its burden of proof under G.S. 108C-12(d) that a prior claim denial should be overturned, the provider must prove that (i) all required documentation was provided at the time the claim was submitted and was available for review by the prepayment review vendor and (ii) the claim should not have been denied at the time of the vendor's initial review.

(2011-399, s. 1; 2017-57, s. 11H.19(a).)

Editor's Note.

- Session Laws 2017-57, s. 11H.19(b), made the rewriting of this section by Session Laws 2017-57, s. 11H.19(a), effective October 1, 2017, and applicable to providers who are placed on prepayment review on or after that date and written notices provided to providers on or after that date.

Session Laws 2017-57, s. 1.1, provides: "This act shall be known as the 'Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2017.'"

Session Laws 2017-57, s. 39.6, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

- Session Laws 2017-57, s. 11H.19(a), rewrote the section. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 108C-8. Threshold recovery amount.

The Department shall not pursue recovery of Medicaid or Health Choice overpayments owed to the State for any total amount less than one hundred fifty dollars ($150.00) unless directed to do so by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services or unless such recovery would be cost-effective and in the best interest of the State of North Carolina and Medicaid recipients.

(2011-399, s. 1.)

§ 108C-9. Provider enrollment criteria.

Applicants who submit an initial application for enrollment in North Carolina Medicaid or North Carolina Health Choice shall be required to submit an attestation and complete trainings prior to being enrolled.

The applicant's attestation shall contain a statement that the applicant's organization has met the minimum business requirements necessary to comply with all federal and State requirements governing the Medicaid and Children's Health Insurance programs, does not owe any outstanding taxes or fines to the U.S. or North Carolina Departments of Revenue or Labor or the Division of Employment Security (DES) of the Department of Commerce, does not owe any final overpayment, assessment, or fine to the North Carolina Medicaid or North Carolina Health Choice programs or any other State Medicaid or Children's Health Insurance program, and has implemented a corporate compliance program as required under federal law. The Department shall set forth by rule the minimum business requirements necessary to comply with all federal and State requirements governing the Medicaid and Children's Health Insurance Program.

Prior to being initially enrolled in the North Carolina Medicaid or Health Choice programs, an applicant's representative shall attend trainings as designated by the Department in rules, including, but not limited to, the following:

The Basic Medicaid Billing Guide, common billing errors, and how to avoid them.

Audit procedures, including explanation of the process by which the Department extrapolates audit results.

How to identify Medicaid recipient fraud.

How to report suspected fraud or abuse.

Medicaid recipient due process and appeal rights.

Online training shall be available for completion through the Department's Web site. The Department may charge a fee to recover costs of such trainings.

Making any materially false or misleading statement in an attestation or enrollment application shall be grounds for denial, termination of, or permanent exclusion from enrollment in the North Carolina Medicaid or North Carolina Health Choice programs.

(2011-399, s. 1; 2011-401, s. 5.1.)

Editor's Note.

- Session Laws 2020-4, s. 1.1, provides: "This act shall be known as the "2020 COVID-19 Recovery Act."

Session Laws 2020-4, s. 1.2, provides: "Except as otherwise provided, the following definitions apply in this act:

"(1) CDC. - The federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.

"(2) Coronavirus or COVID-19. - The coronavirus disease 2019.

"(3) COVID-19 emergency. - The period beginning March 10, 2020, and ending on the date the Governor signs an executive order rescinding Executive Order No. 116 (2020), Declaration of a State of Emergency to Coordinate Response and Protective Actions to Prevent the Spread of COVID-19.

"(4) COVID-19 Recovery Legislation. - The following legislation enacted by Congress:

"a. The Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and Economic Security (CARES) Act, P.L. 116-136.

"b. The Families First Coronavirus Response Act, P.L. 116-127.

"c. The Coronavirus Preparedness and Response Supplemental Appropriations Act, 2020, P.L. 116-123.

"d. Paycheck Protection Program and Health Care Enhancement Act, P.L. 116-139."

Session Laws 2020-4, s. 1.3, provides: "The General Assembly finds that State government must serve as a facilitator in assisting local governments, communities, families, workers and other individuals, and businesses in accessing federal relief and recovery funds related to the COVID-19 pandemic. The purpose of this act is to fulfill the General Assembly's constitutional duty to appropriate all funds, including federal funds appropriated or otherwise made available under the COVID-19 Recovery Legislation, and to direct the use of those funds in a manner that is consistent with the authorizing federal legislation and that responsibly provides for the public health and economic well-being of the State."

Session Laws 2020-4, s. 4.7, provides: "In order for the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Health Benefits, to implement the temporary provider enrollment changes under the 1135 waiver approved by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for the North Carolina Medicaid program and NC Health Choice program, the following statutes shall not apply to the North Carolina Medicaid program and the NC Health Choice program from March 1, 2020, through the duration of the declared nationwide public health emergency as a result of the 2019 novel coronavirus:

"(1)

G.S. 108C-2.1

.

"(2) G.S. 108C-4(a).

"(3) G.S. 108C-9(a) with respect to any required trainings prior to enrollment.

"(4) G.S. 108C-9(c)." Session Laws 2021-62, s. 1.2, effective July 29, 2021, repealed Session Laws 2020-4, s. 4.7.

Session Laws 2020-4, s. 5.2, is a severability clause.

§ 108C-10. Change of ownership and successor liability.

For providers subject to this Chapter, any of the following occurrences shall constitute a change of ownership:

In the case of a partnership, the removal, addition, or substitution of a partner, unless the partners expressly agree otherwise, as permitted by Chapter 59 of the General Statutes.

In the case of a Limited Liability Company (LLC), the withdrawal or removal of a member, or when a person acquires a membership interest from the LLC or when a business entity converts or merges into the LLC pursuant to Chapter 57A of the General Statutes.

In the case of an unincorporated sole proprietorship, the transfer of title and property of the provider that constitute the provider's business of providing services, goods, supplies, or merchandise to a Medicaid or Health Choice recipient to another party.

The merger of the provider corporation into another corporation, or the consolidation of two or more corporations, resulting in the creation of a new corporation. Transfer of corporate stock or the merger of another corporation into the provider corporation shall not constitute change of ownership. Merger of related provider corporations shall not constitute a change in ownership.

The lease of all or part of a provider's facility that will continue to be utilized for the provision of services, goods, supplies, or merchandise to a Medicaid or Health Choice recipient shall constitute a change of ownership of the leased portion.

A provider must notify the Department at least 30 calendar days prior to the effective date of any change of ownership.

An assigned Medicaid administrative participation or enrollment agreement shall be subject to all applicable statutes and regulations and to the terms and conditions under which it was originally issued including, but not limited to, both of the following:

Any existing plan of correction.

Payment of any outstanding final overpayments, assessments, or fines owed to the Department.

The Department shall not as a condition of enrollment require a provider to accept an assigned Medicaid administrative participation or enrollment agreement upon a change in ownership.

(2011-399, s. 1.)

§ 108C-11. Cooperation with investigations and audits.

Providers shall cooperate with all announced and unannounced site visits, audits, investigations, post-payment reviews, or other program integrity activities conducted by the Department. Providers who fail to grant prompt and reasonable access or who fail to timely provide specifically designated documentation to the Department may be terminated from the North Carolina Medicaid or North Carolina Health Choice programs.

The Department shall make all attempts to examine documentation without interfering with the clinical activities of the provider while conducting activities on the provider's premises.

Nothing in this Chapter shall be construed to limit the ability of the federal government, the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services Office of Inspector General, the U.S. Department of Justice, or any of the foregoing entities' contractors or agents, to enforce federal requirements for the submission of documentation in response to an audit or investigation.

(2011-399, s. 1.)

§ 108C-12. Appeals by Medicaid providers and applicants.

General Rule. - Notwithstanding any provision of State law or rules to the contrary, this section shall govern the process used by a Medicaid provider or applicant to appeal an adverse determination made by the Department.

Appeals. - Except as provided by this section, a request for a hearing to appeal an adverse determination of the Department under this section is a contested case subject to the provisions of Article 3 of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.

Final Decision. - The Office of Administrative Hearings shall make a final decision within 180 days of the date of filing of the appeal with the Office of Administrative Hearings. The time to make a final decision shall be extended in the event of delays caused or requested by the Department.

Burden of Proof. - The petitioner shall have the burden of proof in appeals of Medicaid providers or applicants concerning an adverse determination.

(2011-399, s. 1; 2014-100, s. 12H.27(a).)

Editor's Note.

- Session Laws 2014-100, s. 12H.27(d), made the amendment to subsection (d) by Session Laws 2014-100, s. 12H.27(a), applicable to contested cases filed at the Office of Administrative Hearings on or after August 7, 2014.

Session Laws 2014-100, s. 1.1, provides: "This act shall be known as 'The Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2014.'"

Session Laws 2014-100, s. 38.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

- Session Laws 2014-100, s. 12H.27(a), effective August 7, 2014, substituted "petititoner" for "Department" in subsection (d). See Editor's note for applicability.

§ 108C-13. Certain waivers of Medicaid and Health Choice co-payments prohibited.

No provider that has obtained a permit pursuant to G.S. 90-85.21 or G.S. 90-85-21A shall waive the collection of co-payments owed by recipients of Medicaid and Health Choice, as required by the respective program, with the intent to induce recipients to purchase, lease, or order items or services from the permitted provider. For enforcement purposes, a permitted provider that waives a co-payment owed by a recipient of Medicaid or Health Choice is in violation of this subsection regardless of the monetary amount that is waived by the permitted provider. A permitted provider shall not be in violation of this subsection if the provider waives a co-payment owed by a recipient of Medicaid or Health Choice for any of the following reasons:

The waiver is authorized under the Medical Assistance Program or the North Carolina Health Insurance Program for Children.

The permitted provider determines on an individual basis that the collection of the co-payment amount would create a substantial financial hardship for the recipient, provided the waiver of co-payments is not a regular business practice of the provider. For the purposes of this subdivision, a provider shall be considered engaged in the regular business practice of waiving co-payments if the permitted provider holds himself or herself out to recipients as waiving required co-payments.

The permitted provider has made a good-faith effort to collect the co-payment amount, but the permitted provider's reasonable collection efforts fail.

The permitted provider is a health care facility regulated pursuant to Chapter 131E or Chapter 122C of the General Statutes or that is owned or operated by the State of North Carolina.

A violation of this section shall result in suspension or termination by the Department of a permitted provider's participation in Medicaid and Health Choice in accordance with administrative sanctions and remedial measures established by the Department for violations of this section.

(2013-145, s. 1.)

Editor's Note.

- Session Laws 2013-145, s. 2, made this section effective October 1, 2013, and applicable to acts committed on or after that date.

§ 108C-14. Provider performance bonds.

Subject to the provisions of this section, the Department may require Medicaid-enrolled providers to purchase a performance bond in an amount not to exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) naming as beneficiary the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Health Benefits, or provide to the Department a validly executed letter of credit or other financial instrument issued by a financial institution or agency honoring a demand for payment in an equivalent amount. The Department may require the purchase of a performance bond or the submission of an executed letter of credit or financial instrument as a condition of initial enrollment, reenrollment, recredentialing, or reinstatement if any of the following are true:

The provider fails to demonstrate financial viability.

The Department determines there is significant potential for fraud and abuse.

The Department otherwise finds it is in the best interest of the Medicaid program to do so.

The Department shall specify the circumstances under which a performance bond or executed letter of credit will be required.

The Department may waive or limit the requirements of subsection (a) of this section for individual Medicaid-enrolled providers or for one or more classes of Medicaid-enrolled providers based on the following:

The provider's or provider class's dollar amount of monthly billings to Medicaid.

The length of time an individual provider has been licensed, endorsed, certified, or accredited in this State to provide services.

The length of time an individual provider has been enrolled to provide Medicaid services in this State.

The provider's demonstrated ability to ensure adequate record keeping, staffing, and services.

The need to ensure adequate access to care.

In waiving or limiting requirements of this section, the Department shall take into consideration the potential fiscal impact of the waiver or limitation on the State Medicaid Program. The Department shall provide to the affected provider written notice of the findings upon which its action is based and shall include the performance bond requirements and the conditions under which a waiver or limitation apply.

(2013-360, s. 12H.17(a); 2019-81, s. 15(a).)

Effect of Amendments.

- Session Laws 2019-81, s. 15(a), effective July 1, 2019, substituted "Division of Health Benefits" for "Division of Medical Assistance" in the introductory paragraph of subsection (a).